en: Canned drained apricot in syrup
fr: Abricot au sirop appertisé égoutté

en: Canned apricots in syrup
fr: Abricots au sirop appertisés
hr: Konzervirane marelice u sirupu
lt: Konservuoti abrikosai sirupe

en: Canned apricots in light syrup not drained
fr: Abricots au sirop léger appertisés non égouttés

en: Bananas in syrup
fr: Bananes au sirop
nl: Bananen op siroop

en: Canned mixed fruits in syrup, Canned mixed fruit in syrup, Canned fruit cocktail in syrup
de: Dosenfruchtcocktail in Sirup
es: Mezclas de frutas en almíbar, Macedonias de frutas en almíbar, Cocktail de frutas en almíbar
fi: Hedelmäsekoitus sokeriliemessä, Hedelmäcocktail sokeriliemessä
fr: Cocktail de fruits au sirop, Mélange de fruits au sirop
hr: Konzervirano miješano voće u sirupu
it: Frutta mista sciroppata in scatola
lt: Konservuoti įvairūs vaisiai sirupe
nl: Fruitcocktails op siroop

en: Cherries in syrup, Maraschino cherries
de: Kirschen in Sirup
es: Cerezas en almíbar
fr: Cerises au sirop
hr: Višnje u saftu
it: Ciliegie sciroppate
lt: Vyšnios sirupe
nl: Kersen op siroop

en: Lingonberries in syrup
de: Preiselbeeren in Sirup
fr: Airelles au sirop
hr: Brusnice u sirupu

en: Lychees in syrup
de: Litschies in Sirup
es: Lichis en almíbar
fr: Lychees au sirop, Litchis au sirop
hr: Liči u sirupu
lt: Ličiai sirupe
nl: Litchis op siroop

en: Mangoes in syrup
bg: Манго в сироп
de: Mangos in Sirup
es: Mangos en almíbar
fr: Mangues au sirop
hr: Mango u sirupu
it: Mango sciroppati
lt: Mangai sirupe
nl: Mangos op siroop

en: Canned pineapples in syrup, Pineapple in syrup
bg: Ананас в сироп
de: Ananas in Sirup
es: Piña en almíbar, Piña en almíbar ligero
fi: ananasta sokeriliemessä
fr: Ananas au sirop
hr: Ananas u sirupu
lt: Ananasai sirupe
nl: Ananas op siroop

en: Canned drained pineapple in pineapple juice and syrup
fr: Ananas au sirop et jus d'ananas appertisé égoutté

en: Canned drained pineapple in light syrup
fr: Ananas au sirop léger appertisé égoutté

en: Canned pineapple in pineapple juice and syrup not drained
fr: Ananas au sirop et jus d'ananas appertisé non égoutté

en: Canned pineapple in light syrup not drained
fr: Ananas au sirop léger appertisé non égoutté

en: Canned peaches
da: Dåseferskner
de: Dosenpfirsich
sv: Burkpersikor

en: Canned peaches in juice
da: Dåseferskner i juice
sv: Burkpersikor i juice, Persikor i juice

en: Peaches in syrup
bg: Праскови в сироп
de: Pfirsische in Sirup
es: Melocotones en almíbar
fi: persikoita sokeriliemessä
fr: Pêches au sirop
hr: Breskve u sirupu
it: Pesche sciroppate
lt: Persikai sirupe
nl: Perziken op siroop

en: Canned drained peach in light syrup
fr: Pêches au sirop léger en conserve, Pêches au sirop léger appertisées

en: Canned peach in light syrup
fr: Pêches au sirop léger en conserve non égouttées, Pêches au sirop léger appertisées non égouttées

en: Mandarin oranges in syrup
fr: Mandarines au sirop
hr: Mandarine u sirupu
lt: Mandarinai sirupe